Tennessee, session 114, HB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (33).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-253(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Local education insurance committee, created by § 8-27-301;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1585
010085
- 1 -